Missouri, session 2026, HB1934.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 173, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 173.057, to read as follows:
173.057. 1. As used in this section, the term "public colleges and universities"
means any public community college, public college, or public university located in this
state.
2. There is hereby established the "College Admission and Financial Aid Letter
Consistency Task Force" to develop standardized forms for public colleges and
universities to use for admission letters and student financial aid award letters.
3. All task force members shall be appointed before October 1, 2026. The task
force shall consist of fifteen members appointed as follows:
(1) Three parents or legal guardians of students who attend a public university
or two-year college in this state, appointed by the joint committee on education;
(2) Three students who attend a public university or two-year college in this
state, appointed by the joint committee on education;
(3) An administrator from a public institution of higher education who is
involved in admissions, appointed by the commissioner of higher education;
(4) An administrator from a public institution of higher education who is
involved in financial aid, appointed by the commissioner of higher education;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1934 2
(5) A representative of a public community college who is involved in
admissions, appointed by a statewide organization of community colleges;
(6) A representative of a public community college who is involved in finance,
appointed by a statewide organization of community colleges;
(7) A career and technical education professional who has experience serving as
an advisor to a statewide career and technical education organization, appointed by a
statewide career and technical education organization;
(8) A secondary school counselor, appointed by a statewide association of school
counselors;
(9) A secondary school career and college counselor, appointed by a statewide
association of school counselors;
(10) An apprenticeship professional, appointed by the department of higher
education and workforce development; and
(11) A representative of the State Technical College of Missouri, appointed by
the college's board of regents.
4. The members of the task force shall elect a chair from among the membership
of the task force. The task force shall meet as needed to perform its duties and complete
its findings and recommendations as described in this section. The department of
higher education and workforce development shall provide any legal, research, clerical,
and technical services the task force requires in the performance of its duties. Members
of the task force shall serve without compensation but may, subject to appropriation, be
reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of official
duties as members of the task force. No school district policy or administrative action
shall require any education employee member to use personal leave or incur a reduction
in pay for participating on the task force.
5. The task force shall develop a standard admission letter and a standard
financial aid award letter to be used by all public colleges and universities. The
standard financial aid award letter shall clearly list at least the following information:
(1) The estimated cost of attendance including, but not limited to, the cost of
tuition and fees, room and board, books, and transportation for the current academic
year as well as estimates for each academic year that the student would need to attend to
earn a degree at such institution, with a disclaimer that the cost of attendance for years
other than the current academic year are estimates and may be subject to change;
(2) All federal, state, and institutional financial aid offered, with an explanation
as to which components will require repayment;
(3) Any expected student or family contribution;
(4) Campus-specific graduation, median borrowing, and loan default rates;

HB 1934 3
(5) A glossary of terms and definitions used in the standard letter; and
(6) Any other necessary information as determined by the task force.
6. Before January 1, 2027, the task force shall submit a report to the speaker of
the house of representatives, the president pro tempore of the senate, the joint
committee on education, and the coordinating board for higher education. The report
shall contain the task force's findings, samples of a recommended standard admission
letter and a standard financial aid award letter, and recommendations for legislation
pertaining to requirements for a standard admission letter and a standard financial aid
award letter to be used by all public colleges and universities.
7. Upon submission of the task force's report, the task force shall dissolve.
✔